Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.020

State tree.

That certain evergreen tree known and described as the western hemlock (Tsuga heterophylla) is hereby designated as the official tree of the state of Washington.

[ 1947 c 191 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10964-120.]